src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON verbs

mända:män V_PESTA  "mennä" ;
ei:e V_EI  "ei" ;
olda:o V_OLDA  "olla" ;
oigeta:oige V_OIGETA  "lähettää" ;
pesta:pez V_PESTA  "pestä" ;
sugida:sugi V_SUGIDA  "sukia" ;
tugeta:tuge V_TUGETA  "tukea" ;
tulda:tul V_PESTA  "tulla" ;
valita:vali V_VALITA  "valita" ;
